test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VTA_AM_IND_waabam_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTA - AM - waabmaa :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	    2	    3	    4       5       6       7
  #per      theme   neg     inan    persnum mod     periph
     
     #inan v obv neg forms might involve ini

     #this is extrapolated from book (p 287-294)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2:   gwaabam
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg: gwaabmin
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl: gwaabmigoo
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir: gwaabmaa
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv: gwaabmig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir: nwaabmaa
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv: nwaabmig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0: gwaabmigon
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0: nwaabmigon
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0:  waabmigon      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+2+Pl:   gwaabmim
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+1+Pl:   gwaabmimi
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+2+Pl: gwaabminnim
     #2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+2+Pl: gwaabminim       #1sg v 2pl #book
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+2+Pl: gwaabmigoom
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl: gwaabmaanaa
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+2+Pl: gwaabmaawaa
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl: gwaabmignaa
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+2+Pl: gwaabmigwaa
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl: nwaabmaanaa
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl: nwaabmignaa

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Prt:   gwaabminaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Dub:   gwaabminaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Prt: gwaabminnaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Dub: gwaabminnaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+Prt: gwaabmigoonaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+Dub: gwaabmigoonaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Prt: gwaabmaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Dub: gwaabmaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Prt: gwaabmigba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Dub: gwaabmigdig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Prt: nwaabmaaba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Dub: nwaabmaadig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Prt: nwaabmigba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Dub: nwaabmigdig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+3+4:  waabmaan     #3obv v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+3+4:  waabmigoon   #3sg v 3obv

     #2 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5), (4, 6), (4, 7)
     #                      (5, 6), (5, 7)
     #                      (6, 7)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl: gwaabmignaawaa
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl: gwaabmignaa
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl: nwaabmignaa
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl:  waabmignaawaa      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Prt: gwaabmignaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Dub: gwaabmignaadig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Prt: nwaabmignaaba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Dub: nwaabmignaadig
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Prt:  waabmignaaba      #0sg v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Dub:  waabmignaadig     #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+0+Pl: gwaabmignan
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+0+Pl: nwaabmignan
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+0+Pl:  waabmignan      #0pl v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+2+Pl+Prt:   gwaabmimwaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+2+Pl+Dub:   gwaabmimwaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+1+Pl+Prt:   gwaabmimnaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+1+Pl+Dub:   gwaabmimnaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabminnimwaaba
     #2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabminimwaaba  #1sg v 2pl #book
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabminnimwaadig
     #2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabminimwaadig  #1sg v 2pl #book
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmigoomwaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmigoomwaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+Prt: gwaabmaamnaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+Dub: gwaabmaamnaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmaawaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmaawaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Prt: gwaabmigminaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Dub: gwaabmigminaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmigwaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmigwaadig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+Prt: nwaabmaamnaaba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+Dub: nwaabmaamnaadig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Prt: nwaabmigminaaba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Dub: nwaabmigminaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+3+Pl: gwaabmaanaanig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+2+Pl+3+Pl: gwaabmaawaag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+3+Pl: gwaabmignaanig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+2+Pl+3+Pl: gwaabmigwaag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+3+Pl: nwaabmaanaanig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+3+Pl: nwaabmignaanig
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+2+Pl+3+4:   waabmaawaan      #3pl v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+2+Pl+3+4:   waabmigwaan      #3obv v 3pl

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmaabniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmaadgenag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmigbaniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmigdigenag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Prt+3+Pl: nwaabmaabniig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Dub+3+Pl: nwaabmaadgenag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Prt+3+Pl: nwaabmigbaniig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Dub+3+Pl: nwaabmigdigenag
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Prt+3+4:   waabmaabniin     #3sg v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Dub+3+4:   waabmaadgenan    #3sg v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Prt+3+4:   waabmigbaniin     #3obv v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Dub+3+4:   waabmigdigenan    #3obv v 3sg

     #3 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5, 6), (4, 5, 7), (4, 6, 7)
     #                      (5, 6, 7)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmignaawaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmignaawaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+Prt: gwaabmigminaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+Dub: gwaabmigminaadig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+Prt: nwaabmigminaaba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+Dub: nwaabmigminaadig
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+Prt:  waabmignaawaaba      #0sg v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+Dub:  waabmignaawaadig      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+0+Pl: gwaabmignaawaan
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+0+Pl: gwaabmignaanin
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+0+Pl: nwaabmignaanin
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+0+Pl:  waabmignaawaan      #0pl v 3pl

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabmignaabniin
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabmignaadgenan
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Prt+0+Pl: nwaabmignaabniin
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Dub+0+Pl: nwaabmignaadgenan
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Prt+0+Pl:  waabmignaabniin    #0pl v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+Dub+0+Pl:  waabmignaadgenan   #0pl v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmaamnaabniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmaamnaadgenag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmaawaabniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmaawaadgenag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmigminaabniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmigminaadgenag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmigwaabniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmigwaadgenag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: nwaabmaamnaabniig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: nwaabmaamnaadgenag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: nwaabmigminaabniig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: nwaabmigminaadgenag
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+2+Pl+Prt+3+4:   waabmaawaabniin       #3pl v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+2+Pl+Dub+3+4:   waabmaawaadgenan      #3pl v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+2+Pl+Prt+3+4:   waabmigwaabniin       #3obv v 3pl (0sg too?)
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+2+Pl+Dub+3+4:   waabmigwaadgenan      #3obv v 3pl (0sg too?)

     #4 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5, 6, 7)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabmignaawaabniin
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabmignaawaadgenan
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabmigminaabniin
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabmigminaadgenan
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: nwaabmigminaabniin
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+1+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: nwaabmigminaadgenan
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+Prt+0+Pl:  waabmignaawaabniin    #0pl v 3pl
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+0+2+Pl+Dub+0+Pl:  waabmignaawaadgenan   #0pl v 3pl

     #NEGATIVES BELOW
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Neg:   gwaabmisii
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg: gwaabmisnoon
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg: gwaabmigoosii
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg: gwaabmaasii
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg: gwaabmigsii
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg: nwaabmaasii
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg: nwaabmigsii

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0: gwaabmigsiin
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0: nwaabmigsiin
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0:  waabmigsiin      #0sg v 3sg
